Nebraska, session 109, LB549.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB549 LB549
2025 2025
Section 1. (1) For purposes of this section, chaplain means a
clergy member that is licensed, ordained, or endorsed by their religious
organization and trained to serve in secular environments.
(2)(a) A school board may employ a chaplain, including in a
volunteer capacity, to perform various duties at the school including
providing academic, career, emotional, and behavioral health supports to
students. A chaplain employed pursuant to this section shall not be
required to hold a certificate to teach, administer, or perform special
services in this state.
(b) The employment of a chaplain pursuant to this section shall not
be construed as an endorsement of any particular religion.
(3) Prior to such employment, a chaplain shall be subject to a
criminal history record information check pursuant to section 79-814.01
and shall pay any required fees for such check. A school board shall not
employ a chaplain pursuant to this section if the chaplain's eligibility
is denied by the Commissioner of Education based on such criminal history
record information check.
(4) A school board shall, prior to employment of a chaplain pursuant
to this section, develop a policy consistent with this section relating
to employment of an uncertified individual to perform various duties at
the school as described in subdivision (2)(a) of this section. The policy
shall include provisions relating to the employment, discipline,
continued education, and termination of employment of a chaplain.
(5) Nothing in this section shall require that a school board employ
a chaplain pursuant to this section.
Sec. 2. Section 79-804, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-804 (1) Each teacher or administrator shall register his or her
certificate with the public, private, denominational, or parochial school
in which the teacher or administrator is employed. The superintendent or
administrator of the school shall endorse upon the certificate that it
-2-

LB549 LB549
2025 2025
has been registered and the date of registration. Such registration shall
be without fee. No employment of a teacher or administrator shall be
valid until the certificate is so registered. On or before September 15
of each year, the public, private, denominational, and parochial schools
shall file with the State Department of Education a fall personnel report
which shall specify the names of all individuals employed by the school
who are required by law to hold a certificate and such other information
as the Commissioner of Education directs. The superintendent or
administrator of the school shall transmit within ten days to the State
Department of Education the name of the teacher or administrator to be
employed, together with the position to which employed, if the teacher or
administrator is employed after the submission of the fall personnel
report. The Commissioner of Education shall certify to the school the
name of any teacher or administrator who has not been issued a
certificate or given evidence of application to the State Department of
Education and qualification for a certificate or permit. The teacher or
administrator shall not be reimbursed for any services to the school
after the date of receipt of notification by the school.
(2) The Commissioner of Education shall notify the county treasurer
to withhold all school money belonging to any district employing an
uncertificated teacher or administrator until the teacher or
administrator has obtained a certificate or has been dismissed by the
board employing such teacher or administrator. The county treasurer shall
withhold such money.
(3) This section shall not apply to a chaplain employed pursuant to
section 1 of this act.
Sec. 3. Section 79-805, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-805 (1) The school board or board of education shall be
personally liable for all public money paid to teachers or administrators
who are not qualified under sections 79-806 to 79-815. A teacher or
-3-

LB549 LB549
2025 2025
administrator violating such sections shall not recover any money for
services while teaching during the time that such contract and
certificate are invalid. Any person having knowledge of the employment by
a school district of an uncertified teacher or administrator may prefer
charges against the board.
(2) This section shall not apply to a chaplain employed pursuant to
section 1 of this act.
Sec. 4. Section 79-814.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-814.01 (1) Upon request by the commissioner, the Nebraska State
Patrol shall undertake a search for criminal history record information
relating to an applicant for a certificate pursuant to subdivision (1)(c)
of section 79-808 or an applicant for employment as a chaplain pursuant
to section 1 of this act, including transmittal of the applicant's
fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a national
criminal history record information check. The criminal history record
information check shall include information concerning the applicant from
federal repositories of such information and repositories of such
information in other states if authorized by federal law. The Nebraska
State Patrol shall issue a report to the commissioner that shall include
the criminal history record information concerning the applicant.
(2) The commissioner may deny issuance of a certificate or permit or
the eligibility of a chaplain to be employed by a school board pursuant
to section 1 of this act to any applicant who has a felony conviction or
who has any misdemeanor conviction involving abuse, neglect, or sexual
misconduct. In reviewing an applicant's criminal history record
information, the commissioner shall take into consideration any
information, including information submitted by the applicant, regarding
(a) the facts and circumstances surrounding a conviction, (b) the type of
offense and the sentence imposed, (c) whether the conduct resulting in a
conviction would constitute a crime in Nebraska, (d) the date of the
-4-

LB549 LB549
2025 2025
offense, (e) the age of the applicant at the time of the offense, and (f)
the applicant's conduct and positive social contributions since the
offense.
(3) The board shall determine and set the costs for processing
criminal history record information checks pursuant to this section, and
section 79-808, and section 1 of this act which shall be borne by the
applicant for a certificate or permit. The costs shall be limited to the
actual direct costs arising from the processing of the criminal history
record information checks.
(4) Criminal history record information subject to federal
confidentiality requirements shall remain confidential and may be
released only upon the written authorization by the applicant, except
that if the applicant appeals the denial by the commissioner of a
certificate or permit or the eligibility of a chaplain to be employed by
a school board pursuant to section 1 of this act by the commissioner, the
filing of an administrative appeal shall constitute a release of the
information for the limited purpose of the appeal. If the applicant
requests a closed hearing, such request shall be subject to the Open
Meetings Act.
Sec. 5. Original sections 79-804, 79-805, and 79-814.01, Reissue
Revised Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
-5-